Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-808
Property not subject to condemnation.

Property now used or hereafter acquired for offstreet motor vehicle parking by a private operator shall not be subject to condemnation.

Laws 1955, c. 35, § 8, p. 146.